apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="ġ/ewnaħ__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ewnaħ</l><r>ewnaħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wienaħ</l><r>ewnaħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/abel__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>abel</l><r>abel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bula</l><r>abel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/anżir__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>anżir</l><r>anżir<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nieżer</l><r>anżir<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="por/ga__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>og</l><r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/ejt__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ejt</l><r>ejt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jut</l><r>ejt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="g/endus__n_m">
    <e><p><l>endus</l><r>endus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niedes</l><r>endus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/afif__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>afif</l><r>afif<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>fief</l><r>afif<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/orbies__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>orbies</l><r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rabes</l><r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riebes</l><r>orbies<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="r/iefnu__n_m">
    <e><p><l>iefnu</l><r>iefnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wiefen</l><r>iefnu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="wer/c__n_m">
    <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ec</l><r>c<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/uz__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>uz</l><r>uz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wiez</l><r>uz<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="r/eġina__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>eġina</l><r>eġina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ġejjen</l><r>eġina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="f/orn__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>orn</l><r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ran</l><r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/uffara__n_f">
    <e><p><l>uffara</l><r>uffara<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>fafar</l><r>uffara<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="r/ukkell__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ukkell</l><r>ukkell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kiekel</l><r>ukkell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="sk/arpan__n_m">
    <e><p><l>arpan</l><r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rapan</l><r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rapen</l><r>arpan<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/idrija__n_f">
    <e><p><l>idrija</l><r>idrija<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>dieri</l><r>idrija<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/ilbla__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ilbla</l><r>ilbla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>liebel</l><r>ilbla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="tar/ġa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ġa</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ag</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/int__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>int</l><r>int<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nut</l><r>int<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="t/aġen__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aġen</l><r>aġen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>waġen</l><r>aġen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="r/okna__n_f">
    <e><p><l>okna</l><r>okna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kejjen</l><r>okna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="nb/id__n_m">
    <e><p><l>id</l><r>id<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ejjed</l><r>id<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/enduq__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>enduq</l><r>enduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niedaq</l><r>enduq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/errieq__n_m">
    <e><p><l>errieq</l><r>errieq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieraq</l><r>errieq<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/ifer__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ifer</l><r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wiefer</l><r>ifer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="r/ussett__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ussett</l><r>ussett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sieset</l><r>ussett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="bor/ża__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ża</l><r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oż</l><r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="dgħaj/sa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>sa</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jes</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="p/inzell__n_m">
    <e><p><l>inzell</l><r>inzell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niezel</l><r>inzell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="t/akkuna__n_f">
    <e><p><l>akkuna</l><r>akkuna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kaken</l><r>akkuna<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħr/afa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>afa</l><r>afa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ejjef</l><r>afa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/emm__n_m">
    <e><p><l>emm</l><r>emm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>mija</l><r>emm<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="g/erżuma__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>erżuma</l><r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieżem</l><r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="p/antor__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>antor</l><r>antor<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>natar</l><r>antor<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/alq__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>alq</l><r>alq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lieq</l><r>alq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>luq</l><r>alq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="xe/nxul__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>nxul</l><r>nxul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>xniel</l><r>nxul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/aruf__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aruf</l><r>aruf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rief</l><r>aruf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/aħar__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aħar</l><r>aħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iħra</l><r>aħar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/add__n_m">
    <e><p><l>add</l><r>add<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>dud</l><r>add<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="xal/l__n_m">
    <e><p><l>l</l><r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>el</l><r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="porga" c="laxative" ><i>por</i><par n="por/ga__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="taġen" c="frying pan" ><i>t</i><par n="t/aġen__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rokna" c="corner" ><i>r</i><par n="r/okna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="suffara" c="whistle" ><i>s</i><par n="s/uffara__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="demm" c="blood" ><i>d</i><par n="d/emm__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dorbies" c="lion" ><i>d</i><par n="d/orbies__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="reġina" c="queen" ><i>r</i><par n="r/eġina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħabel" c="rope" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/abel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tarġa" c="stair" ><i>tar</i><par n="tar/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pantor" c="flounce" ><i>p</i><par n="p/antor__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xall" c="shawl" ><i>xal</i><par n="xal/l__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="werc" c="cross-eyed person" ><i>wer</i><par n="wer/c__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="russett" c="heron" ><i>r</i><par n="r/ussett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xenxul" c="newly formed bunch of grapes" ><i>xe</i><par n="xe/nxul__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħafif" c="light" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/afif__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sponża" c="sponge" ><i>spon</i><par n="bor/ża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bejt" c="roof" ><i>b</i><par n="b/ejt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gendus" c="bull" ><i>g</i><par n="g/endus__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="skarpan" c="shoemaker" ><i>sk</i><par n="sk/arpan__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="senduq" c="chest" ><i>s</i><par n="s/enduq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħrafa" c="fable" ><i>ħr</i><par n="ħr/afa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rukkell" c="bobbin" ><i>r</i><par n="r/ukkell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġewnaħ" c="wing" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ewnaħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="takkuna" c="heel" ><i>t</i><par n="t/akkuna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pinzell" c="brush" ><i>p</i><par n="p/inzell__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="baħar" c="sea" ><i>b</i><par n="b/aħar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="riefnu" c="gale" ><i>r</i><par n="r/iefnu__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nbid" c="wine"><i>nb</i><par n="nb/id__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="inbid" c="wine"><i>inb</i><par n="nb/id__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="serrieq" c="saw" ><i>s</i><par n="s/errieq__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ħanżir" c="pig" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/anżir__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħaruf" c="lamb" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/aruf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħalq" c="mouth" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/alq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dgħajsa" c="boat" ><i>dgħaj</i><par n="dgħaj/sa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żejt" c="oil" ><i>ż</i><par n="b/ejt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="buz" c="pair of boots" ><i>b</i><par n="b/uz__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="forn" c="oven" ><i>f</i><par n="f/orn__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċint" c="parapet wall" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/int__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sidrija" c="waistcoat" ><i>s</i><par n="s/idrija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bilbla" c="lark" ><i>b</i><par n="b/ilbla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gerżuma" c="throat" ><i>g</i><par n="g/erżuma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="borża" c="paper bag" ><i>bor</i><par n="bor/ża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħadd" c="Sunday" ><par n="il-/bieraħ__adv"/><i>Ħ</i><par n="ħ/add__n_m"/></e>
